Utah statutes.
79-2-403.   Rulemaking for sale of real property -- Licensed or certified
appraisers -- Exceptions.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, if the department buys, sells, or exchanges real property, the department
shall make rules to ensure that the value of the real property is congruent
with the proposed price and other terms of the purchase, sale, or exchange.
(2)  The rules:
(a)  shall establish procedures for determining the value of the real
property;
(b)  may provide that an appraisal, as defined under Section 61-2b-2,
demonstrates the real property's value; and
(c)  may require that the appraisal be completed by a state-certified general
appraiser, as defined under Section 61-2b-2.
(3)  Subsection (1) does not apply to the purchase, sale, or exchange of real
property, or to an interest in real property:
(a)  that is under a contract or other written agreement prior to May 5, 2008;
or
(b)  with a value of less than $100,000, as estimated by the state agency.
